Utah statutes.
20A-11-1301.   School board office candidate -- Campaign requirements.
(1)  Each school board office candidate shall deposit each contribution and
public service assistance received in one or more separate accounts in a
financial institution that are dedicated only to that purpose.
(2)  A school board office candidate may not deposit or mingle any
contributions or public service assistance received into a personal or
business account.
(3)  A school board office candidate may not make any political expenditures
prohibited by law.
(4)  If a person who is no longer a school board candidate chooses not to
expend the monies remaining in a campaign account, the person shall continue
to file the year-end summary report required by Section 20A-11-1302 until the
statement of dissolution and final summary report required by Section
20A-11-1304 are filed with:
(a)  the lieutenant governor in the case of a state school board candidate;
and
(b)  the county clerk, in the case of a local school board candidate.
(5) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b) and Section 20A-11-402, a
person who is no longer a school board candidate may not expend or transfer
the monies in a campaign account in a manner that would cause the former
school board candidate to recognize the monies as taxable income under federal
tax law.
(b)  A person who is no longer a school board candidate may transfer the
monies in a campaign account in a manner that would cause the former school
board candidate to recognize the monies as taxable income under federal tax
law if the transfer is made to a campaign account for federal office.
(6) (a)  As used in this Subsection (6) and Section 20A-11-1303, "received"
means:
(i)  for a cash contribution, that the cash is given to a legislative office
candidate or a member of the candidate's personal campaign committee;
(ii)  for a contribution that is a negotiable instrument or check, that the
negotiable instrument or check is negotiated; and
(iii)  for any other type of contribution, that any portion of the
contribution's benefit inures to the legislative office candidate.
(b)  Each school board office candidate shall report each contribution and
public service assistance to the lieutenant governor within 30 days after the
contribution or public service assistance is received.
